Tennessee, session 114, HB0272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (48).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-252(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee film, entertainment and music commission, created by § 4-3-5003;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0272
000353
- 1 -